GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-lastnames.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# 
!# CONTENT:    last names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# CONTENT:    last names
!# 
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	09-Jul-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols
 
+Prop

+Lastname

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	XSG	+MF+Sg		#;

LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;	! invariant

LEXICON ROOT 
Agnelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Aliprandi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Aloi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ancelotti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Andreotti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Angelini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Antonini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ariosto+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Arnaudo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Aversano+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
bin% Laden+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Balbo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Barbero+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bassanini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bateson+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Beccaria+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bedoni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Belbo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bembo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Berlini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Berselli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Biglieri+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Billia+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bindi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bismark+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bompiani+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Borghezio+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bossi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Broccoletti+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Brusca+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Buffoni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Buttiglione+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Cacciari+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Calatroni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Camilleri+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Campanella+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Capelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Caracciolo+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Casadei+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Cassia+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Cataldi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Cavaliere+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Celentano+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ceolin+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Chigi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Chomsky+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ciampi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Cipriani+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Clinton+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Contini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Coppi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Cossutta+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Crespo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Cusani+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
D'Addario+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
D'Alembert+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Darwin+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
D'Azeglio+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
De% André+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
De% Benedetti+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Chirico+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Felice+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Flaviis+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Gaulle+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Gregorio+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Klerk+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Dell'Osso+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
De% Lorenzo+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Lucchi+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Martino+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Matteis+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Mauro+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
De% Michelis+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Nicola+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Sanctis+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
De% Togni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
De% Vitto+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Diderot+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Dini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Di% Pasquale+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Donizetti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Dow+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Eco+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Eisenhower+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Fazio+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Feltrinelli+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Ferruzzi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Fini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Fioravanti+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Floresta+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Formigoni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Foscolo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Francini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Freud+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Galati+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Galli% Della% Loggia+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Gandini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Garamond+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Garibaldi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Gasparri+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ghali+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Giaffreda+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Giannini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Giolitti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Giovagnini+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Gorbaciov+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Goria+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Gramsci+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Grigioni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Grotti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Guccini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Guglielmi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Guttuso+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Hagege+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Hegel+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Hitler+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Honecker+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Iervolino+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Jackson+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Jones+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Kappler+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Kennedy+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Krenz+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Lacan+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Lallicata+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Larizza+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Laterza+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Leopardi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Levi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ligabue+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Locatelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Lo% Porto+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Machiavelli+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Maigret+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Malgeri+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mambro+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mancino+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mancuso+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Manfredi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Maradona+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Maroni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Martinazzoli+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Martucci+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mascagni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Masi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mattarelle+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Matteoli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mazzetto+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mbeki+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Menem+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Milosevic+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mitterrand+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Molière+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mondadori+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Montale+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Monterisi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Morea+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mugabe+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Mussolini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Napolitano+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Neruda+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Newton+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Nicoletti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Nietzsche+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Nobel+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
O'Callaghan+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
O'Neal+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
O'Hagan+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
O'% Callaghan+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
O'% Neal+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
O'% Hagan+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Oberdan+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Occhionero+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Orwell+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pagani+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pannella+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Parkinson+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pascal+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pasolini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pastore+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Peano+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pennac+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Perec+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pertini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pietro+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pirandello+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Pivetti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Poletti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pomicino+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Popper+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Portesi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Privitera+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Prodi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Provenzano+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Puglisi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Puxeddu+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Quasimodo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rastrelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rauti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Reinhold+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Renzi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rizzoli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Romanelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rossini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rubbia+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ruini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rutelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Saddam+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Salvi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Sanfilippo+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Saragat+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Scalfari+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Scalise+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Schwarzenegger+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Scoglio+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Scoto+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Segni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Seneca+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Sgarbi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Siccardi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Smith+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Sodano+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Spadolini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Spinsanti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Stasi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Svevo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Tarantino+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Tascio+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Tatarella+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Teso+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Trapattoni+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Trevisanato+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Turati+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Vattimo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Verdi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Verga+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Visalberghi+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Vittorini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Wagner+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Wittgenstein+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Zaccagnini+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Zanardelli+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Zanone+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Zavattaro+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Zingarelli+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Zuccaro+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Russo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Esposito+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Colombo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ricci+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Greco+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Marino+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bruno+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Giordano+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rizzo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Barbieri+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Fontana+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Caruso+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rinaldi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ferrara+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Leone+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Conte+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Marini+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bianco+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
De% Santis+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Fiore+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Longo+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Martinelli+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Vitale+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Marchi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Grasso+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Rizzi+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Riva+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Testa+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Ferro+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Castelli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Bruni+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Poli+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Alberti+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
Pellegrino+Prop+Lastname	XSP;
Sartori+Prop+Lastname		XSP;
